Nevada, session 83, AB362.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Title 32 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new chapter to consist of the provisions set forth as
sections 2 to 24.18, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in sections 2.5, 3 and 4 of
this act have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 2.5. “Controlling interest” means:
1. With respect to a corporation, owning, controlling or
holding more than 50 percent of:
(a) The total combined voting power of all classes of stock of
the corporation; or
(b) The capital, profits or beneficial interest in the voting stock
of the corporation.
-
*AB362_R1*

– 3 –
2. With respect to any entity other than a corporation,
owning, controlling or holding more than 50 percent of the
capital, profits or beneficial interest in the entity.
Sec. 3. “Estimated fair market value” means the estimated
price the real property would bring on the open market in a sale
between a willing buyer and a willing seller. Such price must be
derived from the assessor’s taxable value or the prior purchasing
price, if the prior purchase was within the 5 years immediately
preceding the date of valuation, whichever is higher.
Sec. 4. “Taxpayer” means any person liable for a tax
imposed by this chapter.
Sec. 5. The Department may prescribe such regulations as it
may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
Sec. 5.3. With regard to the administration of any tax
imposed by this chapter, the county recorder shall apply the
principles set forth in NRS 375.018.
Sec. 5.5. 1. A county recorder who has any question of law
regarding the imposition or collection of any tax imposed by this
chapter shall request an opinion from the district attorney
pursuant to NRS 252.160. The district attorney shall request an
opinion from the Attorney General pursuant to NRS 228.150 if:
(a) The county recorder informs the district attorney that there
is a conflict between the opinions of two or more district attorneys
in this State on the question; or
(b) The district attorney:
(1) Chooses not to render an opinion on the question; or
(2) Determines that he or she will not be able to render an
opinion on the question within a reasonable time.
2. If, according to an opinion issued by the Attorney General
in response to a request submitted pursuant to subsection 1, the
amount of any taxes received by a county recorder differs from the
amount required by law, the county recorder shall cause the notice
required by section 24.13 of this act to be given to the taxpayer.
Sec. 5.7. 1. The Department shall, to ensure that the tax
imposed by subsection 2 of section 8 of this act is collected fairly
and equitably in all counties, coordinate the collection and
administration of that tax. For this purpose, the Department may
conduct such audits of the records of the various counties as are
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter with respect to
subsection 2 of section 8 of this act.
2. When requested, the Department shall render assistance to
the county recorder of a county whose population is less than
30,000 relating to the imposition and collection of the tax imposed
by subsection 2 of section 8 of this act.
-
*AB362_R1*

– 4 –
3. The Department is not entitled to receive any fee for
rendering any assistance pursuant to subsection 2.
Sec. 6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 8. 1. There is hereby imposed a tax on the sale or
transfer of a controlling interest in any entity which possesses,
directly or indirectly, an interest in real property in this State when
the value of the interest in real property exceeds $100, at the rate
of:
(a) If the real property is located in a county whose population
is 700,000 or more, $1.25; and
(b) If the real property is located in a county whose population
is less than 700,000, 65 cents,
 for each $500 of value, or fraction thereof, of the interest in
real property possessed, directly or indirectly, by the entity.
2. In addition to all other taxes imposed pursuant to this
section, there is hereby imposed a tax on the sale or transfer of a
controlling interest in any entity which possesses, directly or
indirectly, an interest in real property in this State when the value
of the interest in real property exceeds $100, at the rate of $1.30
for each $500 of value, or fraction thereof, of the interest in real
property possessed, directly or indirectly, by the entity.
3. In addition to all other taxes imposed pursuant to this
section, there is hereby imposed a tax on the sale or transfer of a
controlling interest in any entity which possesses, directly or
indirectly, an interest in real property which is located in a county
whose board of county commissioners has imposed a tax pursuant
to NRS 375.026 when the value of the interest in real property
exceeds $100, at the rate which is an amount of cents per $500 of
value, or fraction thereof, of the interest in real property
possessed, directly or indirectly, by the entity that is equal to the
amount of cents per $500 of value, or fraction thereof, imposed by
the board of county commissioners of the county as the rate for
the tax pursuant to NRS 375.026.
4. For the purposes of this section, an entity only possess an
interest in real property if the entity possesses, directly or
indirectly, more than 50 percent of the total ownership interest in
the real property. The value of an entity’s interest in real property
is the estimated fair market value of the real property.
5. A taxable sale or transfer of a controlling interest in an
entity includes a single transaction or a series of related
transactions. It is presumed that transactions which occur within
24 months of each other are a series of related transactions.
6. A taxable sale or transfer of a controlling interest in an
entity includes a sale or transfer made by one seller or transferor
-
*AB362_R1*

– 5 –
or a sale or transfer made by a group of sellers or transferors
acting in concert. It is presumed that sellers or transferors are
acting in concert if the sellers or transferors are:
(a) Persons who are related to each other by blood or marriage
within the fourth degree of consanguinity; or
(b) Entities which are under common control.
Sec. 9. 1. On or before the last day of the month
immediately following the month in which the sale or transfer of a
controlling interest in an entity which is subject to any of the taxes
imposed by section 8 of this act occurs, the person receiving the
interest shall file with the county recorder of each county in which
the entity has an interest in real property a return and remit to the
county recorder any tax due pursuant to section 8 of this act. The
return must separately:
(a) Identify each parcel of real property in the county in which
the entity possesses, directly or indirectly, an interest;
(b) State the estimated fair market value of each parcel of real
property in the county in which the entity possesses, directly or
indirectly, an interest; and
(c) State the amount of tax remitted with respect to each such
parcel.
2. Unless filed electronically, returns must be signed by the
person required to file the return or by his or her authorized agent
but need not be verified by oath.
Sec. 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10.5. If, after acceptance of the return filed pursuant to
section 9 of this act, the county recorder disallows an exemption
that was claimed at the time the return was filed or through audit
or otherwise determines that an additional amount of tax is due,
the county recorder shall promptly notify the person who filed the
return of the additional amount of tax due. If the additional
amount of tax is not paid within 30 days after the date the person
is notified, the county recorder shall impose a penalty of 10
percent of the additional amount due in addition to interest at a
rate of 1 percent per month, or a portion thereof, of the additional
amount due calculated from the date the return was filed through
the date on which the additional amount due, penalty and interest
are paid to the county recorder.
Sec. 11. 1. The county recorder shall transmit the proceeds
of the tax imposed by section 8 of this act at the end of each
quarter in the following manner:
(a) An amount equal to that portion of the proceeds which is
equivalent to 10 cents for each $500 of value or fraction thereof in
the Account for Affordable Housing created pursuant to
NRS 319.500.
-
*AB362_R1*

– 6 –
(b) In a county whose population is 700,000 or more, an
amount equal to that portion of the proceeds which is equivalent
to 60 cents for each $500 of value or fraction thereof must be
transmitted to the county treasurer for deposit in the county school
district’s fund for capital projects established pursuant to NRS
387.328, to be held and expended in the same manner as other
money deposited in that fund.
(c) In a county whose population is less than 700,000, an
amount equal to that portion of the proceeds which is derived from
the tax imposed by subsection 3 of section 8 of this act must be
transmitted to the State Treasurer for use as required by
NRS 561.355.
(d) An amount equal to that portion of the proceeds which is
equivalent to $1.30 for each $500 of value or fraction thereof must
be transmitted to the State Controller for deposit in the State
General Fund.
(e) The remaining proceeds must be transmitted to the State
Controller for deposit in the Local Government Tax Distribution
Account created by NRS 360.660 for credit to the respective
accounts of Carson City and each county.
2. From the taxes required to be transmitted to the State
Controller pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1, the county
recorder of each county may deduct and withhold 2 percent of
those taxes to reimburse the county for the cost of collecting the
tax.
3. In addition to any other authorized use of the proceeds it
receives pursuant to subsection 1, a county or city may use the
proceeds to pay expenses related to or incurred for the
development of tier one affordable housing and tier two affordable
housing. A county or city that uses the proceeds in that manner
must give priority to the development of tier one affordable
housing and tier two affordable housing for persons who are
elderly or persons with disabilities.
4. The expenses authorized by subsection 3 include, without
limitation:
(a) The costs to acquire land and development rights;
(b) Related predevelopment expenses;
(c) The costs to develop the land, including the payment of
related rebates;
(d) Contributions toward down payments made for the
purchase of affordable housing; and
(e) The creation of related trust funds.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Tier one affordable housing” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 278.01902.
-
*AB362_R1*

– 7 –
(b) “Tier two affordable housing” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 278.01906.
Sec. 12. The taxes imposed by section 8 of this act do not
apply to a transfer of the controlling interest in an entity:
1. To the United States, any territory or state or any agency,
department, instrumentality or political subdivision thereof.
2. Between former spouses in compliance with a decree of
divorce.
3. To or from a trust without consideration.
4. Which possesses, directly or indirectly, an interest in an
unpatented mine or mining claim, with respect to the unpatented
mine or mining claim. The taxes imposed by section 8 of this act
remain applicable with respect to other real property which the
entity possess.
5. To a corporation or other business organization if the
person making the transfer owns 100 percent of the corporation or
organization to which the transfer is made.
Sec. 13. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 14. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 15. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 16. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 17. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 18. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 19. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 20. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 21. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 22. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 23. Any person who willfully falsely declares the
estimated fair market value of real property on a return filed
pursuant to section 9 of this act is guilty of a misdemeanor and
shall pay the amount of any additional tax required on account of
the falsification and a penalty which is equal to 25 percent of that
amount.
Sec. 24. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 24.1. The county recorder shall:
1. Conduct and apply audits and other procedures for
enforcement as uniformly as is feasible.
2. Collect any tax that is due pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter in an equitable manner so that every taxpayer pays
the full amount imposed by law.
Sec. 24.2. 1. The county recorder may audit all records
relating to the collection and calculation of any tax imposed by
this chapter. If the county recorder deems it necessary to conduct
an audit, the audit must be completed within 3 years after the date
the relevant return was filed.
-
*AB362_R1*

– 8 –
2. The county recorder may issue subpoenas to require the
production of documents necessary to determine the amount of the
tax due pursuant to this chapter or to determine whether a person
qualifies for an exemption from taxes pursuant to this chapter.
The county recorder may have the subpoenas served, and upon
application of the district attorney, to any court of competent
jurisdiction, enforced in the manner provided by law for the
service and enforcement of subpoenas in a civil action.
Sec. 24.3. 1. If an audit is conducted by the county
recorder pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the date on
which the audit will be completed must be included in the notice to
the taxpayer that the audit will be conducted.
2. The date on which the audit will be completed may be
extended by the county recorder if the county recorder gives prior
written notice of the extension to the taxpayer. The notice must
include an explanation of the reason or reasons that the extension
is required.
3. If, after the audit, the county recorder determines that
delinquent taxes are due, interest and penalties may not be
imposed for the period of the extension if the taxpayer did not
request the extension or was not otherwise the cause of the
extension.
Sec. 24.4. Any amount determined to be refundable by the
county recorder after an audit must be refunded to the taxpayer.
Sec. 24.5. 1. If any tax imposed pursuant to this chapter is
not paid when due, the county may, within 4 years after the date
that the tax was due, record a certificate in the office of the county
recorder which states:
(a) The amount of the tax and any interest or penalties due;
(b) The name and address of the person who is liable for the
amount due as they appear on the records of the county; and
(c) That the county recorder has complied with all procedures
required by law for determining the amount due.
2. From the time of the recording of the certificate, the
amount due, including interest and penalties, constitutes a
demand for payment.
Sec. 24.6. 1. If a person is delinquent in the payment of any
tax imposed by this chapter or has not paid the amount of a
deficiency determination, the county may bring an action in a
court of this State, a court of a county of any other state or a court
of the United States that has competent jurisdiction to collect the
delinquent or deficient amount, penalties and interest. The action:
(a) May not be brought if the decision that the payment is
delinquent or that there is a deficiency determination is on appeal
to a hearing officer pursuant to section 24.17 of this act.
-
*AB362_R1*

– 9 –
(b) Must be brought not later than 4 years after the payment
became delinquent or the determination became final.
2. The district attorney shall prosecute the action. The
provisions of the Nevada Revised Statutes, Nevada Rules of Civil
Procedure and Nevada Rules of Appellate Procedure relating to
service of summons, pleadings, proofs, trials and appeals are
applicable to the proceedings. In the action, a writ of attachment
may issue. A bond or affidavit is not required before an
attachment may be issued.
3. In an action, a certificate by the county recorder showing
the delinquency is prima facie evidence of:
(a) The determination of the tax or the amount of the tax;
(b) The delinquency of the amounts; and
(c) The compliance by the county recorder with all the
procedures required by law relating to the computation and
determination of the amounts.
Sec. 24.7. In an action relating to a tax imposed pursuant to
this chapter, process must be served:
1. In accordance with the requirements for service of process
set forth in the Nevada Rules of Civil Procedure; or
2. By serving the taxpayer at their place of residence in this
State or their last known address.
Sec. 24.8. A lien may, within 5 years after the date of the
judgment or within 5 years after the last extension of the lien in a
manner provided in this chapter, be extended by recording in the
office of the county recorder a certified copy of the judgment, and
from the time of that recording, the lien must be extended upon
the property in that county for 5 years unless sooner released or
otherwise discharged.
Sec. 24.9. 1. The county or its authorized representative
may issue a warrant for the enforcement of a lien and for the
collection of any delinquent tax that is administered pursuant to
this chapter:
(a) Within 4 years after the person is delinquent in the
payment of the tax; or
(b) Within 5 years after the last recording of a certificate copy
constituting a lien for the tax.
2. The warrant must be directed to a sheriff or constable and
has the same effect as a writ of execution.
3. The warrant must be levied and the sale made pursuant to
the warrant in the same manner and with the same effect as a levy
of and a sale pursuant to a writ of execution.
Sec. 24.10. The county may pay or advance to the sheriff or
constable the same fees, commissions and expenses or acting upon
the warrant as are provided by law for acting upon a writ of
-
*AB362_R1*

– 10 –
execution. The county must approve the fees for publication in a
newspaper. Approval from a court is not required for the
publication.
Sec. 24.11. 1. The amounts, including interest and
penalties, required to be paid by any person pursuant to this
chapter must be satisfied first if:
(a) The person is insolvent;
(b) The person makes a voluntary assignment of his or her
assets;
(c) The estate of the person in the hands of executors,
administrators or heirs, before distribution, is insufficient to pay
all the debts due from the deceased; or
(d) The estate and effects of an absconding, concealed or
absent person required to pay any amount by force of such
revenue act are levied upon by process of law.
2. This section does not give the county recorder a preference
over:
(a) Any recorded lien that attached before the date when the
amounts required to be paid became a lien; or
(b) Any costs of administration, funeral expenses, expenses of
personal illness, family allowances or debts preferred pursuant to
federal law or wages as provided in NRS 147.195.
Sec. 24.12. A certificate by the county recorder stating that
real property has been released from a lien imposed pursuant to
this chapter is conclusive evidence that the property has been
released.
Sec. 24.13. If an officer or employee of the county recorder
determines that a taxpayer is entitled to an exemption or has been
taxed more than is required by law, he or she shall give written
notice of that determination to the taxpayer. The notice must:
1. Be given within 30 days after the officer or employee
makes his or her determination or, if the determination is made as
a result of an audit, within 30 days after the completion of the
audit; and
2. If appropriate, include instructions indicating the manner
in which the taxpayer may petition for a refund of any
overpayment.
Sec. 24.14. A taxpayer is entitled to receive on any
overpayment of any tax imposed by this chapter a refund together
with interest at a rate determined pursuant to NRS 17.130. No
interest is allowed on a refund of any penalties or interest on the
tax that is paid by a taxpayer.
Sec. 24.15. The county recorder shall provide a taxpayer
with a response to any written request submitted by the taxpayer
-
*AB362_R1*

– 11 –
that relates to a tax imposed by this chapter within 30 days after
the county treasurer receives the request.
Sec. 24.16. 1. After reviewing a petition for a refund, the
county recorder or his or her designee shall approve or disapprove
the refund. If the county recorder approves the refund, he or she
shall grant the refund to the taxpayer.
2. If the county recorder denies a refund, the petitioner may
file a written notice of appeal to the county recorder within 45
days after the date the county recorder decides to deny the petition.
If notice is not received by the county recorder within 45 days after
his or her decision to deny the petition, the decision of the county
recorder is final.
3. If the county recorder receives a timely notice of appeal
pursuant to subsection 2, he or she shall set a date for a hearing
before a hearing officer and notify the parties of the date, place
and time of the hearing.
Sec. 24.17. 1. Any person who is aggrieved by a decision of
the county recorder made pursuant to this chapter may appeal the
decision by filing a notice of appeal with the county recorder
within 30 days after service of the decision upon that person.
2. A hearing officer, appointed by the county, may review any
decision made by the county recorder and may reverse, affirm or
modify any decision of the county recorder. A hearing officer
appointed pursuant to this section must not be an employee of the
county recorder’s office. A decision of a hearing officer is a final
decision for purposes of judicial review.
3. Service of a decision made by the county recorder or a
hearing officer pursuant to this chapter must be made personally
or by certified mail. If service is made by certified mail:
(a) The decision must be enclosed in an envelope that is
addressed to the taxpayer at his or her address as it appears on the
declaration of value or in the records of the county.
(b) It is deemed to be complete at the time the appropriately
addressed envelope containing the decision is deposited with the
United States Postal Service.
4. All decisions of the county recorder made pursuant to this
chapter are final unless appealed.
5. A county recorder or local government that is a party and
is aggrieved by the decision of the hearing officer may seek
judicial review of the decision in the district court of that county.
Sec. 24.18. 1. The county recorder may waive any tax,
penalty and interest owed by the taxpayer pursuant to this chapter,
other than the tax imposed by subsection 2 of section 8, if the
taxpayer meets the criteria adopted by regulation. If a waiver is
-
*AB362_R1*

– 12 –
granted pursuant to this subsection, the county shall prepare and
maintain on file a statement that contains:
(a) The reason for the waiver;
(b) The amount of the tax, penalty and interest owed by the
taxpayer; and
(c) The amount of the tax, penalty and interest waived by the
county.
2. If the county recorder or a designated hearing officer finds
that the failure of a person to make a timely payment of any tax
imposed is the result of circumstances beyond his or her control
and occurred despite the exercise of ordinary care and without
intent to avoid such payment, the county recorder may relieve the
person of all or part of any interest or penalty or both.
3. If a person proves to the satisfaction of the county recorder
that the person has in good faith remitted the tax in reliance upon
written advice provided by an officer or employee of the county
recorder, an opinion of the district attorney or Attorney General or
the written results of an audit of the taxpayer’s records conducted
by the county recorder, the county recorder may not require the
taxpayer to pay delinquent taxes, penalties or interest if the county
recorder determines after the completion of a subsequent audit
that the taxes the taxpayer remitted were deficient.
Sec. 25. NRS 561.355 is hereby amended to read as follows:
561.355 1. The following fees and money must be used by
the Division of Plant Health and Compliance of the Department
only for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this chapter
and chapters 552, 554, 555 and 587 of NRS:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 552.095 and 555.570,
fees and money collected pursuant to the provisions of chapters 552,
555 and 587 of NRS.
(b) Laboratory fees collected for the diagnosis of infectious,
contagious and parasitic diseases of bees, as authorized by NRS
561.305, and as are necessary pursuant to the provisions of chapter
552 of NRS.
(c) Laboratory fees collected for the diagnosis of infectious,
contagious and destructive diseases of agricultural commodities, and
infestations thereof by pests, as authorized by NRS 561.305, and as
may be necessary pursuant to the provisions of chapter 554 of NRS.
(d) Laboratory fees collected for the survey and identification of
insect pests, plant diseases and noxious weeds, as authorized by
NRS 561.305, and as may be necessary pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 555.005 to 555.249, inclusive.
(e) Laboratory fees collected for the testing of the purity and
germinating power of agricultural seeds, as authorized by
-
*AB362_R1*

– 13 –
NRS 561.305, and as may be necessary pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 587.015 to 587.123, inclusive.
(f) Money received from a tax on the transfer of real property
imposed pursuant to NRS 375.026.
(g) Money received from a tax on the sale or transfer of a
controlling interest in an entity which possesses an interest in real
property imposed pursuant to section 8 of this act.
2. The money received pursuant to paragraph (f) or (g) of
subsection 1 must be allocated for disbursement to each county in
proportion to the amount of money collected with respect to real
property in that county and must only be used:
(a) By the Department for programs on the exclusion, detection
and control of:
(1) Invasive species; and
(2) Endemic pests and weeds designated by the Director; and
(b) For grants to local governments and nonprofit organizations
for the control or management of such species, pests and weeds.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Invasive species” means any living organism not native to
this State that may present a threat to the economy, environment or
public health of this State.
(b) “Local government” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 237.050.
Sec. 25.5. Section 11 of this act is hereby amended to read as
follows:
Sec. 11. 1. The county recorder shall transmit the
proceeds of the tax imposed by section 8 of this act at the end
of each quarter in the following manner:
(a) An amount equal to that portion of the proceeds which
is equivalent to 10 cents for each $500 of value or fraction
thereof in the Account for Affordable Housing created
pursuant to NRS 319.500.
(b) In a county whose population is 700,000 or more, an
amount equal to that portion of the proceeds which is
equivalent to 60 cents for each $500 of value or fraction
thereof must be transmitted to the county treasurer for deposit
in the county school district’s fund for capital projects
established pursuant to NRS 387.328, to be held and
expended in the same manner as other money deposited in
that fund.
(c) In a county whose population is less than 700,000, an
amount equal to that portion of the proceeds which is derived
from the tax imposed by subsection 3 of section 8 of this act
must be transmitted to the State Treasurer for use as required
by NRS 561.355.
-
*AB362_R1*

– 14 –
(d) An amount equal to that portion of the proceeds which
is equivalent to $1.30 for each $500 of value or fraction
thereof must be transmitted to the State Controller for deposit
in the State General Fund.
(e) The remaining proceeds must be transmitted to the
State Controller for deposit in the Local Government Tax
Distribution Account created by NRS 360.660 for credit to
the respective accounts of Carson City and each county.
2. From the taxes required to be transmitted to the State
Controller pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1, the
county recorder of each county may deduct and withhold 1
percent of those taxes to reimburse the county for the cost of
collecting the tax.
3. In addition to any other authorized use of the proceeds
it receives pursuant to subsection 1, a county or city may use
the proceeds to pay expenses related to or incurred for the
development of tier one affordable housing and tier two
affordable housing. A county or city that uses the proceeds in
that manner must give priority to the development of tier one
affordable housing and tier two affordable housing for
persons who are elderly or persons with disabilities.
4. The expenses authorized by subsection 3 include,
without limitation:
(a) The costs to acquire land and development rights;
(b) Related predevelopment expenses;
(c) The costs to develop the land, including the payment
of related rebates;
(d) Contributions toward down payments made for the
purchase of affordable housing; and
(e) The creation of related trust funds.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Tier one affordable housing” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 278.01902.
(b) “Tier two affordable housing” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 278.01906.
Sec. 26. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 25, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
-
*AB362_R1*

– 15 –
3. Section 25.5 of this act becomes effective on October 1,
2030.
H
-
*AB362_R1*